New York, session 2025-2026, S6558.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph b of subdivision 2 of section 679-e of the educa- 2 tion law, as amended by section 1 of part VV of chapter 56 of the laws 3 of 2009, is amended to read as follows: 4 b. "Eligible period" means the [six-year] seven-year period after 5 completion of the [third] second year and before the commencement of the 6 tenth year of employment as an eligible attorney. For purposes of this 7 section, all periods of time during which an admitted attorney was 8 employed as an eligible attorney and all periods of time during which a 9 law school graduate awaiting admission to the New York state bar was 10 employed by a prosecuting or criminal defense agency as permitted by 11 section four hundred eighty-four of the judiciary law shall be combined. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. Nothing in this act shall 13 be implemented in a manner that diminishes the current award or status 14 of eligible attorneys currently participating in the program. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07620-01-5